Arkansas, session 2025, SB521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-9-209 is amended to read as follows:
12-9-209. Reimbursement for training costs or expenses.
(a)(1) If a county, city, town, or state agency law enforcement agency
pays the costs or expenses for training a law enforcement officer at a state-
funded or municipally operated law enforcement training academy and another
county, city, town, or state agency law enforcement agency employs that law
enforcement officer within eighteen (18) twenty-four (24) months after
completion of the training in a position requiring a certificate of training
from a state-funded or municipally operated law enforcement training academy,
the county, city, town, or state agency law enforcement agency that employs
the law enforcement officer, at the time of employing the law enforcement
officer, shall reimburse the county, city, town, or state agency law
enforcement agency for all or a portion of the costs or expenses incurred by
*CEB123*
03/19/2025 1:29:39 PM CEB123

SB521
the county, city, town, or state agency law enforcement agency for the
training of the law enforcement officer at the state-funded or municipally
operated law enforcement training academy, unless the law enforcement officer
has been terminated by the county, city, town, or state agency law
enforcement agency that paid the costs or expenses of training, in which case
no reimbursement is required from the county, city, town, or state agency law
enforcement agency employing the law enforcement officer.
(2) Reimbursement may be sought only from the first county,
city, town, or state agency by each successive law enforcement agency that
employed the law enforcement officer after the county, city, town, or state
agency first law enforcement agency paid the costs or expenses of training
within the twenty-four-month period after the date of the law enforcement
officer's completion of training.
(3) Reimbursement shall include any salary, travel expenses,
food, lodging, or other costs, including nonrecoverable equipment costs,
required to be paid by the county, city, town, or state agency, law
enforcement agency as follows:
(A) If the law enforcement officer is employed within two
(2) twelve (12) months after completion of the training, the employing law
enforcement agency shall reimburse the total of the costs or expenses of
training; or
(B) If the law enforcement officer is employed more than
two (2) twelve (12) months but not more than six (6) twenty-four (24) months
after completion of the training, the employing law enforcement agency shall
reimburse eighty percent (80%) fifty percent (50%) of the costs or expenses
of training;
(C) If the law enforcement officer is employed more than
six (6) months but not more than ten (10) months after completion of the
training, the employing agency shall reimburse sixty percent (60%) of the
costs or expenses of training;
(D) If the law enforcement officer is employed more than
ten (10) months but not more than fourteen (14) months after completion of
the training, the employing agency shall reimburse forty percent (40%) of the
costs or expenses of training; or
(E) If the law enforcement officer is employed more than
fourteen (14) months but not more than eighteen (18) months after completion
03/19/2025 1:29:39 PM CEB123

SB521
of the training, the employing agency shall reimburse twenty percent (20%) of
the costs or expenses of training.
(b)(1) A request for reimbursement shall:
(A) Be in writing;
(B) Contain an itemized list of costs to be reimbursed;
and
(C) Be made by the original employing law enforcement
agency to the subsequent employing law enforcement agency within six (6)
months of the date on which the law enforcement officer was hired by the
subsequent law enforcement agency.
(2) If any county, city, town, or state agency law enforcement
agency that employs a law enforcement officer whose costs or expenses of
training were paid by another county, city, town, or state agency law
enforcement agency fails to make reimbursement for the costs or expenses of
training as required in subsection (a) of this section, the county, city,
town, or state agency law enforcement agency entitled to reimbursement shall
notify the Treasurer of State.
(2)(3) The Treasurer of State shall then withhold the amount of
the reimbursement due for training the law enforcement officer from the
county or municipal aid of the employing county, city, town, or state agency
law enforcement agency or from funds appropriated to the employing state
agency and shall remit the amount to the county, city, town, or state agency
law enforcement agency that is entitled to the reimbursement under the
provisions of this section.
(c)(1) A private community with a population of more than five
thousand (5,000) persons that employs certified law enforcement officers is
entitled to reimbursement under this section and may remit the reimbursed
costs or expenses under subsection (a) of this section to an entity
contracting with the private community that paid the training costs or
expenses of the certified law enforcement officers.
(d) A law enforcement agency that employs on a permanent basis a law
enforcement officer who has completed training at a state-funded or
municipally-operated law enforcement training academy shall comply with this
section.
(2)(e) As used in this subsection, section:
(1) "Law enforcement agency" means the same as defined in § 12-
03/19/2025 1:29:39 PM CEB123

SB521
9-102; and
(2) "private Private community” means the same as defined in §
14-14-814.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 12-9-602(a)(1), concerning the employment
or appointment, or separation from employment or appointment of a law
enforcement officer, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) An employing law enforcement agency shall immediately notify
the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training, in a manner adopted
by the division, of the employment or appointment, or separation from
employment or appointment, of any law enforcement officer.
(B) Upon notification by an employing law enforcement
agency of employment or appointment of any law enforcement officer, if the
law enforcement officer completed required training from a state-funded or
municipally-operated law enforcement training academy within the last twenty-
four (24) months, the division shall notify the previous employing law
enforcement agency that paid the costs or expenses for training the law
enforcement officer.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is effective on and after January
1, 2026.















03/19/2025 1:29:39 PM CEB123